Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 21 Nurses

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to dentists and dental hygienists, see chapter 15 of this title.

As to nursing home administrators, see chapter 22 of this title.

As to optometrists, see chapter 23 of this title.

For the Wyoming Pharmacy Act, see chapter 24 of this title.

As to physical therapists, see chapter 25 of this title.

As to physicians and surgeons, see chapter 26 of this title.

For the Wyoming Emergency Medical Services Act, see chapter 36 of this title.

As to immunity from liability for volunteer health care professionals, see §

1-1-129

.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers § 18 et seq.

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancelation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

Revocation of nurse's license to practice profession, 55 ALR3d 1141.

Midwifery: state regulation, 59 ALR4th 929.

Hospital's liability for injury resulting from failure to have sufficient number of nurses on duty, 2 ALR5th 286.

Liability of nursing home for violating statutory duty to notify third party concerning patient's medical condition, 46 ALR5th 821.

70 C.J.S. Physicians and Surgeons §§ 1, 11 to 34.